Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.030

Representation as certified peer specialist.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

Beginning July 1, 2025, except as provided in RCW 71.24.920, the decision of a person practicing peer support services to become certified under this chapter is voluntary. A person may not use the title certified peer specialist unless the person holds a credential under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 469 s 5.]